Hawaii statutes.
[§514E-9.1] Disclosure statement;
prospective purchasers. The purchaser of a time share interest shall be
provided a copy of the disclosure statement filed with and accepted by the
director concurrently with the execution of a sales contract. The disclosure
statement shall be provided in printed form unless the purchaser indicates in a
separate writing the purchaser's election to receive the disclosure statement
through means of a computer disc, electronic mail, download from an internet
site, thumb drive, any other media that may require the use of a device or a
machine to be viewed or heard, or by any other means contemplated by chapter
489E. The separate writing shall include, above the signature line in bold
type and capital letters, the following statement: "ANY PURCHASER HAS
UNDER THE LAW A SEVEN-DAY RIGHT OF RESCISSION OF ANY TIME SHARING SALES
CONTRACT. PURCHASERS SHOULD READ THE DISCLOSURE STATEMENT BEFORE THE SEVEN-DAY
RIGHT OF RESCISSION PERIOD EXPIRES." [L 2014, c 228, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next